test/src/morphology/N-asi47_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asi: # Noun (47) asi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asi+N+Sg+Nom: asi
     asi+N+Sg+Gen: aśa
     asi+N+Sg+Par: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ill: asja
     asi+N+Pl+Gen: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Par: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Ill: [asjohe, asjo]
     asi+N+Pl+All: aśolõ
